Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.170

Metropolitan park district property—Assessment.

All lands held by a metropolitan park district in fee simple, in trust, or otherwise within the limits of a local improvement district in a city or town shall be assessed and charged for their proportion of the cost of all local improvements in the same manner as other property in the district.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.170. Prior: (i) 1929 c 204 s 1; RRS s 9343-1. (ii) 1929 c 204 s 2; RRS s 9343-2.]